Utah statutes.
49-14-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Compensation" means the total amount of payments that are includable
in gross income which are received by a public safety service employee as base
income for the regularly scheduled work period.  The participating employer
shall establish the regularly scheduled work period.  Base income shall be
determined prior to the deduction of member contributions or any amounts the
public safety service employee authorizes to be deducted for salary deferral
or other benefits  authorized by federal law.
(b)  "Compensation" includes performance-based bonuses and cost-of-living
adjustments.
(c)  "Compensation" does not include:
(i)  overtime;
(ii)  sick pay incentives;
(iii)  retirement pay incentives;
(iv)  the monetary value of remuneration paid in kind, including a residence,
use of equipment or uniform, travel, or similar payments;
(v)  a lump-sum payment or special payments covering accumulated leave; and
(vi)  all contributions made by a participating employer under this system or
under any other employee benefit system or plan maintained by a participating
employer for the benefit of a member or participant.
(d)  "Compensation" for purposes of this chapter may not exceed the amount
allowed under Internal Revenue Code Section 401(a)(17).
(2)  "Final average salary" means the amount computed by averaging the highest
three years of annual compensation preceding retirement, subject to
Subsections (2)(a) and (b).
(a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the percentage increase in
annual compensation in any one of the years used may not exceed the previous
year's compensation by more than 10% plus a cost-of-living adjustment equal to
the decrease in the purchasing power of the dollar during the previous year,
as measured by a United States Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index
average as determined by the board.
(b)  In cases where the participating employer provides acceptable
documentation to the office, the limitation in Subsection (2)(a) may be
exceeded if:
(i)  the public safety service employee has transferred from another agency;
or
(ii)  the public safety service employee has been promoted to a new position.
(3)  "Line-of-duty death" means a death resulting from external force,
violence, or disease occasioned by an act of duty as a public safety service
employee.
(4)  "Participating employer" means an employer which meets the participation
requirements of Section 49-14-201.
(5) (a)  "Public safety service" means employment normally requiring an
average of 2,080 hours of regularly scheduled employment per year rendered by
a member who is a:
(i)  law enforcement officer in accordance with Section 53-13-103;
(ii)  correctional officer in accordance with Section 53-13-104; and
(iii)  special function officer approved in accordance with Sections 49-14-201
and 53-13-105.
(b)  "Public safety service" also requires that in the course of employment
the employee's life or personal safety is at risk.
(c)  Except for the minimum hour requirement, Subsections (5)(a) and (b) do
not apply to any person who was eligible for service credit in this system
prior to January 1, 1984.
(6)  "Public safety service employee" means an employee of a participating
employer who performs public safety service under this chapter.
(7)  "System" means the Public Safety Contributory Retirement System created
under this chapter.
(8)  "Years of service credit" means the number of periods, each to consist of
12 full months as determined by the board, whether consecutive or not, during
which a public safety service employee was employed by a participating
employer, including time the public safety service employee was absent in the
service of the United States government on military duty.
